Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.1962

Cheating in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of cheating in the second degree if he or she engages in cheating and his or her conduct does not constitute cheating in the first degree.

(2) Cheating in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2002 c 253 s 3.]